Maine, session 132, LD1603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶U, as amended by PL 2023, c. 682, §2, is further
amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
This paragraph applies to solar energy equipment for property tax years beginning
before April 1, 2025; and
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶V, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §3, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.; and
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶W is enacted to read:
W. Business equipment with a value of no more than $50,000. For purposes of this
paragraph, "business equipment" means tangible personal property that is used or held
for use exclusively for a business purpose by the person in possession of it or, in the
case of construction in progress or inventory parts, is intended to be used exclusively
for a business purpose by the person who will possess that property and includes,
without limitation, repair parts; replacement parts; replacement equipment; additions,
accessions and accessories to other personal property; inventory parts; office furniture,
including lamps and lighting fixtures; and gambling machines or devices, including
associated equipment such as computer equipment, equipment used in the playing
phases of lottery schemes and repair and replacement parts of a gambling machine or
device. "Business equipment" does not include property to the extent it is eligible for
exemption from property tax under any other provision of law.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §655, as amended by PL 2023, c. 682, §§1 to 3, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a political subdivision of the
State may not impose a tax or fee on business equipment with a value of no more than
$50,000.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §6651, sub-§1, as repealed and replaced by PL 2007, c. 627,
§95, is amended to read:
1. Eligible property. "Eligible property" means qualified business property first
placed in service in the State, or constituting construction in progress commenced in the
State, after April 1, 1995 but does not include property that is eligible business equipment
as defined in section 691 exempt from taxation pursuant to section 655, subsection 1,
paragraph W. "Eligible property" includes, without limitation, repair parts, replacement
parts, additions, accessions and accessories to other qualified business property placed in
service on or before April 1, 1995 if the part, addition, accession or accessory is first placed
in service, or constitutes construction in progress, in the State after April 1, 1995, unless
that property is eligible business equipment as defined in section 691 exempt from taxation
Page 1 - 132LR0802(01)

414 pursuant to section 655, subsection 1, paragraph W. "Eligible property" includes used
425 qualified business property if the qualified business property was first placed in service in
436 the State, or constituted construction in progress commenced in the State, after April 1,
447 1995 but does not include property that is eligible business equipment as defined in section
458 691 exempt from taxation pursuant to section 655, subsection 1, paragraph W. "Eligible
469 property" also includes inventory parts.
Sec. 6. Guidance and assistance. The Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Bureau of Revenue Services shall develop and provide guidance to municipalities
and businesses regarding the elimination of the property tax on business equipment with a
value of $50,000 or less. The bureau shall provide assistance to a municipality or business
that requests assistance in complying with this Act.
Sec. 7. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.